Washington statutes.
RCW 13.04.040

Administrator—Appointment of probation counselors and persons in charge of detention facilities—Powers and duties, compensation—Collection of fines.

The administrator shall, in any county or judicial district in the state, appoint or designate one or more persons of good character to serve as probation counselors during the pleasure of the administrator. The probation counselor shall:

(1) Receive and examine referrals to the juvenile court for the purpose of considering the filing of a petition or information pursuant to chapter 13.32A or 13.34 RCW or RCW 13.40.070;

(2) Make recommendations to the court regarding the need for continued detention or shelter care of a child unless otherwise provided in this title;

(3) Arrange and supervise diversion agreements as provided in RCW 13.40.080, and ensure that the requirements of such agreements are met except as otherwise provided in this title;

(4) Prepare predisposition studies as required in RCW 13.40.130, and be present at the disposition hearing to respond to questions regarding the predisposition study: PROVIDED, That such duties shall be performed by the department for cases relating to dependency or to the termination of a parent and child relationship which is filed by the department unless otherwise ordered by the court; and

(5) Supervise court orders of disposition to ensure that all requirements of the order are met.

All probation counselors shall possess all the powers conferred upon sheriffs and police officers to serve process and make arrests of juveniles under their supervision for the violation of any state law or county or city ordinance.

The administrator may, in any county or judicial district in the state, appoint one or more persons who shall have charge of detention rooms or houses of detention.

The probation counselors and persons appointed to have charge of detention facilities shall each receive compensation which shall be fixed by the legislative authority of the county, or in cases of joint counties, judicial districts of more than one county, or joint judicial districts such sums as shall be agreed upon by the legislative authorities of the counties affected, and such persons shall be paid as other county officers are paid.

The administrator is hereby authorized, and to the extent possible is encouraged to, contract with private agencies existing within the community for the provision of services to youthful offenders and youth who have entered into diversion agreements pursuant to RCW 13.40.080.

The administrator shall establish procedures for the collection of fines assessed under *RCW 13.40.080 (2)(d) and (14) and for the payment of the fines into the county general fund.

[ 2004 c 120 s 10; 1995 c 312 s 40; 1983 c 191 s 14; 1979 c 155 s 6; 1977 ex.s. c 291 s 8; 1959 c 331 s 9; 1951 c 270 s 1; 1921 c 43 s 1; 1913 c 160 s 3; RRS s 1987-3.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: RCW 13.40.080 was amended by 2015 c 265 s 25, deleting subsection (2)(d).

Effective date—2004 c 120: See note following RCW 13.40.010.

Short title—1995 c 312: See note following RCW 13.32A.010.

Effective date—Severability—1979 c 155: See notes following RCW 13.04.011.

Effective dates—Severability—1977 ex.s. c 291: See notes following RCW 13.04.005.